New York, session 2025-2026, A3840.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 228 of the executive law is 2 REPEALED. 3 § 2. Subdivisions 2 and 5 of section 99-pp of the state finance law, 4 as added by chapter 371 of the laws of 2022, are amended to read as 5 follows: 6 2. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received by the comp- 7 troller, [pursuant to the provisions of section two hundred twenty-eight 8 of the executive law and all other] consisting of moneys appropriated 9 thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law. Nothing contained 10 in this section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or 11 bequests for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and 12 depositing them into the fund according to law. 13 5. [(a)] Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the back- 14 ground check fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the back- 15 ground check fund and shall not be credited to any other fund. 16 [(b) To the extent practicable, any such remaining funds shall be used 17 to reduce the amount of the fee described in subdivision two of section 18 two hundred twenty-eight of the executive law.] 19 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05499-01-5